Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 4. Restricted Transactions

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Specific performance of agreement to lend or borrow money, 82 ALR3d 1116.

§ 13-3-401.
Real estate loans.

Any bank may make real estate loans upon real estate secured by a mortgage, deed of trust or other instrument of similar security which comprises a lien upon the secured property. A bank may make a real estate loan or purchase these obligations in whole or in part at any time prior to the maturity of the obligation if the participation interest of the bank is adequately protected by the terms of the participation agreement.

Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 32 § 1.

Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 32 § 1.

Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 54, § 1.

Repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 46, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 32 § 1.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 31; R.S. 1931, § 10-131; Laws 1937, ch. 17, § 1; 1939, ch. 25, § 1; 1945, ch. 98, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 35-132; Laws 1947, ch. 120, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 13-21; Laws 1961, ch. 125, § 1; 1963, ch. 89, § 1; 1965, ch. 117, § 1; 1971, ch. 155, § 1; 1977, ch. 67, § 1; ch. 148, § 2; 1979, ch. 34, § 1; 1983, ch. 20, §§ 1, 2; 1992, ch. 46, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 115, § 1; 1996, ch. 54, § 1; 2004, ch. 12, § 1; 2014 ch. 32, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Cross references. —

As to rate of interest when no agreements or provisions exist thereto, see § 40-14-106(e).

The 2004 amendment

added (f).

Laws 2004, ch. 12, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2004

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, repealed former (b)(intro), which stated “Real estate loans may be made in an amount not to exceed ninety percent (90%) of the appraised value of the real estate offered as security for a term not longer than thirty (30) years if the loan is secured by an instrument under the terms of which the installment payments are sufficient to amortize the entire principal of the loan within the period ending on the maturity. Any loan may also be made in an amount not to exceed ninety-five percent (95%) of the appraised value of the real estate offered for security if the amount of the loan in excess of ninety percent (90%) is insured by a mortgage insurance corporation authorized to transact business within the state of Wyoming”; repealed former (c) and (f) pertaining to scenarios in which the real estate loan restrictions setout by the section do not apply.

§ 13-3-402.
Individual indebtedness limitations; generally.

Except as otherwise provided, no bank shall permit any person, firm, partnership, association or corporation to become indebted at origination to the bank in an amount exceeding twenty percent (20%) of the amount of the capital stock of the bank actually paid in and unimpaired plus twenty percent (20%) of its unimpaired surplus fund plus twenty percent (20%) of its unimpaired undivided profits.

As used in this section, W.S.

13-3-403

and

13-3-404

, “loans or extensions of credit”, “indebted” and “obligations” means the direct liability of the maker or acceptor of paper discounted with or sold to a bank and includes, but are not limited to, outstanding letters of credit and unfunded commitments. Indebtedness of a partnership includes the obligations of the several members thereof individually and indebtedness of a corporation includes all obligations of all subsidiaries thereof in which the corporation owns or controls a majority interest.

The board of directors shall review and give prior approval for all combinations of indebtedness of affiliated persons, firms, partnerships, associations or corporations which exceed the limits permitted by subsection (a) of this section. For purposes of this section “affiliated” means that twenty-five percent (25%) or more of each entity is owned or controlled by a common principal.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 75, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1957, §§ 13-22.1, 13-22.2; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1992, ch. 46, § 1; 1998, ch. 106, § 1; 2017 ch. 23, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (a), substituted “at origination” for “at any time.”

§ 13-3-403.
Individual indebtedness limitations; exceptions generally.

The limitation of W.S.

13-3-402

does not apply to the following:

through (iii) Repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 46, § 2.

Obligations in the form of banker’s acceptances of other banks;

Loans or extensions of credit secured by a segregated deposit account in the lending bank, if a security interest has been perfected in the assigned account and, in the case of a deposit eligible for withdrawal prior to the maturity of the secured loan, the bank has established internal procedures which will prevent the release of the security;

Loans or extensions of credit secured by certificates of indebtedness, bonds, notes or treasury bills of the United States or by other debts fully guaranteed as to principal and interest by the United States government. Collateral values shall fully secure the loan or extension of credit at current market value, provided that should market value decline below that of the loan or extension of credit, that within ten (10) days of that decline, the limitations of W.S.

13-3-402

will then apply;

Loans or extensions of credit made in connection with a lender credit card, as defined in W.S. 40-14-140(a)(ix) not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000.00).

and (c) Repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 46, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 106, § 2.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 75, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 13-22.3; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1988, ch. 59, § 1; 1992, ch. 46, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 115, § 1; 1998, ch. 106, § 2.

§ 13-3-404.
Individual indebtedness limitations; exceptions generally; federal obligations.

W.S.

13-3-402

and

13-3-403

do not restrict the making of loans in excess of the limitations to the extent that the repayment of principal and interest is:

An obligation of the United States;

An obligation of entities in which national banks are authorized to invest as established by rule and regulation of the commissioner; or

Guaranteed or insured by any agency of the federal government for the payment of the obligations of which the full faith and credit of the United States is pledged. These commitments shall be unconditional and shall be performed by payment of cash or its equivalent within three (3) months after demand.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 75, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 13-22.4; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1996, ch. 56, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 13-3-405.
Acceptance of drafts and bills of exchange.

Drafts or bills of exchange, drawn upon a bank having not more than six (6) months’ sight to run, may be accepted by a bank. Letters of credit may be issued by a bank only if they are based upon actual commercial or agricultural transactions.

No bank shall accept drafts or bills of exchange or issue letters of credit for any one (1) person or entity to an amount equal at any time in the aggregate to more than twenty percent (20%) of its paid up and unimpaired capital and surplus plus twenty percent (20%) of its unimpaired undivided profits unless the bank is secured either by attached documents or by some other actual security growing out of the same transaction. The aggregate amount of acceptances of letters of credit to any one (1) person or entity shall not at any time exceed the paid-up unimpaired capital and surplus and unimpaired undivided profits of the bank.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, §§ 49, 50; R.S. 1931, §§ 10-151, 10-152; C.S. 1945, §§ 35-154, 35-155; W.S. 1957, §§ 13-35, 13-36; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1998, ch. 106, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to acceptance of draft, see § 34.1-3-409.

As to letters of credit, see chapter 5 of title 34.1.